GRAMMARS/SWEDISH/FST/src/lex-func.lexc
LEXICON PREP	< %+Prep:0 >	#;
LEXICON ADV	< %+Adv:0 >	#;
LEXICON	PTCL	< %+Ptcl:0 >	#;
LEXICON ADJ	< %+Adj:0 >	#;

LEXICON CONJ	< %+Conj:0 >			#;
LEXICON CONJ1	< %+Conj:0 %+Prt1:0 >		#;
LEXICON CONJ2	< %+Conj:0 %+Prt2:0 >		#;
LEXICON COORD	< %+Conj:0 %+Coord:0 >		#;
LEXICON COORD1	< %+Conj:0 %+Coord:0 %+Prt1:0 >	#;
LEXICON SUBORD	< %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0 >	       	#;
LEXICON COINF 	< %+Conj:0 %+Inf:0 >	       	#;

LEXICON RECPRON	< %+Pron:0 %+Recip:0 >		#;
LEXICON DETPRON	< %+DetPron:0 > 		#;
LEXICON RFLPRON < %+Pron:0 %+Refl:0 >		#;
LEXICON RELPRON < %+Pron:0 %+Rel:0 >		#;

LEXICON DET	< %+Det:0 >	   		#;
LEXICON PRON	< %+Pron:0 >			#;

LEXICON ROOT
å% ena% sidan		ADV ;		!# [WA]
aldrig% någonsin	ADV ;		!# [WA]
alldeles		ADV ;		!# [WA]
alltför			ADV ;		!# [WA]
allting			ADV ;		!# [WA]
alltsedan		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] ever since
allvarligt		ADV ;		!# [WA]
ända			ADV ;		!# [WA]
angående		PREP ;		!# [WP] concerning
annars			ADV ;		!# [WA]
annorstädes		ADV ;		!# [WA]
än    			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] than
antagligen		ADV ;		!# [WA]
antingen 		COORD1 ;	!# [SC] either
å			PREP ;		!# [WP] (An older form of på)
apropå			PREP ;		!# [WP] a propos, concerning
årligen			ADV ;		!# [WA]
åtminstone		ADV ;		!# [WA]
åt			PREP ;		!# [WP] to
att			COINF ;		!# [SC] to (infinitival marker)
att  			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] that
av			PREP ;		!# [WP] of, by
även			ADV ;		!# [WA]
även% om		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] even though
både	 		CONJ1 ;		!# [LX] both [...and]		AS@26/08/2010
bak			ADV ;		!# [WA]
bakom			PREP ;		!# [WP] behind
bara% i% den% mån% som	SUBORD ;	!# [SC] only in so far as
beträffande		PREP ;		!# [WP] concerning
bi			ADV ;		!# [WA]
bitti			ADV ;		!# [WA]
bland			PREP ;		!# [WP] among
bort			ADV ;		!# [WA]
bums			ADV ;		!# [WA]
dagligt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
där% borta		ADV ;		!# [WA]
däremot			ADV ;		!# [WA]
därför% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] because
därpå			ADV ;		!# [WA]
då			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as, when
definitivt		ADV ;		!# [WA]
desto			CONJ2 ;		!# [SC] "ju...desto" = 'the...the'
dit			ADV ;		!# [WA]
dittills		ADV ;		!# [WA]
dock			ADV ;		!# [LX] yet, however		AS@24/08/2010
efter% det% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] after
efter			PREP ;		!# [WP] after, past
eftersom    		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as, because
ehuru 			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] though
ej			ADV ;		!# [WA]
eller			COORD ;		!# [SC] or
emedan			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] because
emellan			PREP ;		!# [WP] between
emot			PREP ;		!# [WP] against, towards
enär			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] insofar as
en% gång		ADV ;		!# [WA]
en% gång% per% vecka	ADV ;		!# [WA]
enligt			PREP ;		!# [WP] according to
ens			ADV ;		!# [WA]
etcetera		ADV ;		!# [WA]
extremt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
få			DETPRON ;	!# [LX] few		AS@26/08/2010
få:färre		DETPRON ;	!# [LX] fewer		AS@26/08/2010
fabulöst		ADV ;		!# [WA]
farligt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
fastän			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] although
fast			CONJ ;		!# [SC] though, although
fast			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] although
för% att		ADV ;		!# [WA]
för% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] because, in order that
förbi			PREP ;		!# [WP] past (directional)
för			CONJ ;		!# [SC] for, as
före			PREP ;		!# [WP] before (temporal)
förhoppningsvis		ADV ;		!# [WA]
för			PREP ;		!# [WP] for, too
förr			ADV ;		!# [WA]
förrän			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] (not) until
först			ADV ;		!# [WA]
fortfarande		ADV ;		!# [WA]
förutsatt% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] provided that
fram			ADV ;		!# [WA]
framför			ADV ;		!# [WA]
framför			PREP ;		!# [WP] before, in front of
framförallt		ADV ;		!# [WA]
från			PREP ;		!# [WP] from
ganska			ADV ;		!# [WA]
genast			ADV ;		!# [WA]
genom% att 		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] by the fact that, in that
genom			PREP ;		!# [WP] through
givetvis		ADV ;		!# [WA]
gôr			ADV ;		!# [WA]
gratis			ADV ;		!# [WA]
här			ADV ;		!# [WA]
härligt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
hart% när		ADV ;		!# [WA]
hellre			ADV ;		!# [LX] rather			AS@26/08/2010	
helt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
hemma			ADV ;		!# [WA]
himla			ADV ;		!# [WA]
hitåt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
högt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
hos			PREP ;		!# [WP] at
hur% som% helst		ADV ;		!# [WA]
hursomhelst		ADV ;		!# [WA]
huvudsakligen		ADV ;		!# [WA]
i			PREP ;		!# [WP] in
ibland			ADV ;		!# [WA]
ibland			PREP ;		!# [WP] among, sometimes
icke% desto% mindre	ADV ;		!# [WA]
idag			ADV ;		!# [WA]
i% det% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] in view of the fact that
ifall			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] if
ifatt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
ifrån			PREP ;		!# [WP] from
i% går			ADV ;		!# [WA]
igen			ADV ;		!# [WA]
igenom			PREP ;		!# [WP] through
ihop			ADV ;		!# [WA]
ikring			PREP ;		!# [WP] around
ikväll			ADV ;		!# [WA]
i% morgon		ADV ;		!# [WA]
i% morgon% bitti	ADV ;		!# [WA]
inemot			PREP ;		!# [WP] up to
inför			PREP ;		!# [WP] before
ingenting		ADV ;		!# [WA]
innanför		PREP ;		!# [WP] inside
innan			PREP ;		!# [WP] before
innan			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] before
inom			PREP ;		!# [LX] within			FL@18/08/2010
in			PTCL ;		!# verb particle		AS@18/08/2010	
inte			ADV ;		!# [WA]	! not
inte% längre		ADV ;		!# [WA]
inuti			PREP ;		!# [WP] inside
i% och% med% att	SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as soon as
irrelevant		ADV ;		!# [WA]
i% stället		ADV ;		!# [WA]
i% synnerhet		ADV ;		!# [WA]
jämte			PREP ;		!# [WP] along with
ju			CONJ1 ;		!# [SC] "ju...desto" = 'the...the'
just% nu		ADV ;		!# [WA]
knappast		ADV ;		!# [WA]
kring			PREP ;		!# [WP] around
lagom			ADV ;		!# [WA]
längesedan		ADV ;		!# [WA]
lika			CONJ1 ;		!# [SC] "lika ... som" = 'as...as'
likadant		ADV ;		!# [WA]
liksom			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as
likt			PREP ; 		!# [WP] like
lite% grann		ADV ;		!# [WA]
man			PRON ;		!# [LX] one, you		AS@26/08/2010
medan			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] while
medelst			PREP ;		!# [WP] by means of
med% en% gång		ADV ;		!# [WA]
med			PREP ;		!# [WP] with
mellan			PREP ;		!# [WP] between
men 			CONJ ;		!# [SC] but
mer			ADV ;		!# [LX] more		AS@26/08/2010
mer			ADJ ;		!# [LX] more		AS@26/08/2010
mer:mera		ADJ ;		!# [LX] more		AS@26/08/2010
milt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
morse			ADV ;		!# [WA]
mot			PREP ;		!# [WP] against, towards
någonsin		ADV ;	  	!# [WA]
när			ADV ;		!# [WA]
när			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] when
nedan			ADV ;		!# [LX] below			AS@26/08/2010
neråt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
norr			ADV ;		!# [WA]
nytt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
oavsett			PREP ;		!# [WP] regardless
och			COORD ;		!# [SC] and
ögonaböj		ADV ;		!# [WA]
om			PREP ;		!# [WP] about
om			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] if
om% än			CONJ ;		!#				FL@18/08/2010
omkring			PREP ;		!# [WP] around
orealistiskt		ADV ;		!# [WA]
ostrategiskt		ADV ;		!# [WA]
ovan			PREP ;		!# [WP] over, above
över			PREP ;		!# [WP] over, above
på			PREP ;		!# [WP] on
på% bar% gärning	ADV ;		!# [WA]
på% det% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] that
på% grund% av% att	SUBORD ;	!# [SC] because
på% villkor% att	SUBORD ;	!# [SC] on the condition that
per 	     		PREP ; 		!# [LX] by, per			AS@25/08/2010
plötsligt		ADV ;		!# [WA]
rätt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
rörande			PREP ;		!# [WP] concerning
så			CONJ ;		!# [SC] so
så% att			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] so that
sakligt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
så% länge% som		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as long as
samt			COORD ;		!# [SC] and (also), together with
samtidigt		ADV ;		!# [WA]
samtidigt% som		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] at the same time as
så			DET ;		!# [LX]	"i så fall" in that case 	AS@26/08/2010
så% ofta% som		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as often as
så% småningom		ADV ;		!# [WA]
så% snart% som		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as soon as
såsom	   		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as
såväl			COORD1 ;	!# [LX] as well [... as]	FL@18/08/2010	
såvida			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] provided that
såvitt			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] insofar as
sedan			PREP ;		!# [LX] since			FL@18/08/2010
sedan			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] after, since
sig			RFLPRON ;	!# him/her/itself		AS@04/08/2010	
självklart		ADV ;		!# [WA]
snudd% på		ADV ;		!# [WA]
som			RELPRON ;	!# [LX] who, whom		AS@25/08/2010
som			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as
som% om			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] as if
strax			ADV ;		!# [WA]
tillbaka		ADV ;		!# [WA]
till% exempel		ADV ;		!# [WA]
till			PREP ;		!# [WP] to
tills			PREP ;		!# [WP] until
tills			SUBORD ;	!# [SC] until
troligtvis		ADV ;		!# [WA]
trots% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] though
trots			PREP ;		!# [WP] despite
ty			CONJ ;		!# [SC] for, because 
tyst			ADV ;		!# [WA]
undan			PREP ;		!# [WP] away
under			PREP ;		!# [WP] under, during
under% det% att		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] while
under% kniven		ADV ;		!# [WA]
uppåt			ADV ;		!# [WA]
utan 			CONJ ;		!# [SC] but
utan			PREP ;		!# [WP] without
utan% att   		SUBORD ;	!# [SC] not that
utanför			PREP ;  	!# [LX] outside	(of)		AS@26/08/2010
utifrån			PREP ;		!# [LX] on the basis of		FL@18/08/2010
utomhus			ADV ;		!# [WA]
utom			PREP ;		!# [WP] except
utöver			PREP ;		!# [LX] in addition to		FL@18/08/2010
var			ADV ;		!# [WA]
varandra		RECPRON ;	!# each other			AS@04/08/2010	
varenda			DETPRON ;	!# each 			AS@04/08/2010	
vare% sig		COORD1 ;	!# [SC] neither (only in negative sentences)
varje			DETPRON ;	!# [LX] every			AS@26/08/2010	
varje% gång		ADV ;		!# [WA]
varken			COORD1 ;	!# [SC] neither
väster			ADV ;		!# [WA]
vid			PREP ;		!# [WP] by (next to)
